Hawaii, session 2026, HB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds the tourism sector, a pillar of the State's economy, to be highly seasonal and vulnerable to global economic shifts, natural disasters, and pandemics, leaving small businesses with inconsistent revenue streams and heightened risks.  These compounded pressures have forced many small enterprises to operate with razor‑thin margins, making resilience and adaptability critical for survival. The legislature further finds that technology adoption for small businesses in Hawaii, particularly the tourism sector, is vital for those businesses to overcome these critical challenges and remain competitive in an increasingly digital marketplace.  Leveraging digital tools such as booking systems, online marketing platforms, and data analytics can help reduce costs, expand market reach, and help tourism-based businesses attract and retain customers while enhancing the overall visitor experience.  Furthermore, technology mitigates the risks of geographic isolation by enabling remote work, virtual services, and e-commerce opportunities. Supporting small businesses with technology adoption ensures their ability to innovate and adapt, bolstering their resilience and contributing to the long-term economic sustainability of Hawaii's communities.  However, non‑action would exacerbate Hawaii's economic vulnerabilities. The legislature additionally finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation was established to foster innovation and economic diversification by supporting the growth and development of Hawaii's technology sector.  With decades of experience in implementing technology-driven initiatives, the Hawaii technology development corporation has successfully facilitated numerous projects funded by the State and ensured effective use of state resources, with a proven track record in fostering innovation and economic diversification through state‑funded initiatives, demonstrating expertise in administering grants, supporting startups, promoting public‑private partnerships, empowering local businesses, and driving economic progress.  The Hawaii technology development corporation's expertise spans a wide range of industries, enabling the effective implementation of cutting-edge technologies tailored to Hawaii's unique challenges and opportunities.  The Hawaii technology development corporation's commitment to leveraging state funding for impactful technology projects underscores the agency's role as a critical catalyst for innovation and competitiveness in Hawaii's economy. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to promote economic development and tourism by appropriating funds to the Hawaii technology development corporation to assist small businesses, including those related to the tourism sector, with technology enablement. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii technology development corporation to assist small businesses, including those related to the tourism sector, with technology enablement; provided that the Hawaii technology development corporation may collaborate with other state or county agencies as necessary for the implementation of any projects for the purposes of this section. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The Hawaii technology development corporation shall submit a report to the legislature on the status of assisting small businesses, including those related to the tourism sector, with technology enablement using the funds appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this Act no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.